North Carolina statutes. Chapter 39. Conveyances.
Article 5A. Control Corners in Real Estate Developments.

§§ 39-32.1 through 39-32.4.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-27, s. 2, effective July 1, 2017.

History.

G.S. 39-32.1

; 1947, c. 816, s. 1; 1959, c. 1159; repealed by Session Laws 2017-27, s. 2, effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 39-32.2; 1947, c. 816, s. 2; repealed by Session Laws 2017-27, s. 2, effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 39-32.3; 1947,
c. 816, s. 3; 1997-309, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2017-27, s. 2, effective July 1, 2017. G.S. 39-32.4; 1947, c. 816, s. 4; repealed by Session Laws 2017-27, s. 2, effective July 1, 2017.